Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that protecting public health and the safety of municipal and private drinking water supplies is a fundamental responsibility of the state. In 2024 and 2025, groundwater monitoring conducted by Lewis county, the city of Centralia, and the department of fish and wildlife identified nitrate concentrations in multiple private drinking water wells in the Fords Prairie area that exceeded the federal maximum contaminant level for nitrates. Subsequent investigation, including the Bob Oke game farm groundwater investigation completed in November 2025, confirmed that manure generated by pheasants at the Bob Oke game farm contributes to nitrate loading in the underlying aquifer serving residential and municipal water users.The legislature further finds that the Bob Oke game farm is located over a highly productive and hydrologically sensitive aquifer system that flows toward residential and municipal water supply areas. While the department of fish and wildlife has taken steps to reduce nutrient loading and has committed to voluntary participation in the department of ecology's concentrated animal feeding operation permitting program, the legislature finds that continued operation at the current site presents an ongoing risk of future impacts to drinking water supplies that cannot be fully mitigated through best management practices alone.The legislature therefore declares that it is in the public interest to move the Bob Oke game farm to an alternate location where pheasant rearing and associated operations can be conducted without risk of contaminating municipal or residential drinking water sources. The legislature intends to require the department of fish and wildlife, in coordination with the department of enterprise services, to identify a suitable alternate site within a swift and reasonable time frame, to develop a relocation plan that ensures continuity of wildlife management functions, and to commence the orderly wind down of operations at the current site.It is further the intent of the legislature to ensure that the existing site is remediated to protect groundwater quality, to prevent further nitrate loading to the aquifer, and to restore the property for future use consistent with the protection of public water supplies and surrounding communities. The legislature intends that state agencies model best practices for environmental stewardship, transparency, and accountability in managing public lands and facilities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(1) "Alternate location" means a site or sites identified for the relocation of pheasant rearing and associated operations that, based on hydrogeologic, land use, and water supply analyses, do not pose a material risk of contaminating municipal or residential drinking water supplies.(2) "Bob Oke game farm" means the pheasant rearing and release facility owned and operated by the department located in Lewis county near Centralia.(3)(a) "Public water system" means any system providing water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances, including any collection, treatment, storage, or distribution facilities under control of the purveyor and used primarily in connection with the system. "Public water system" includes collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under control of the purveyor but primarily used in connection with the system, including:(i) Any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under control of the purveyor and used primarily in connection with such system; and(ii) Any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under control of the purveyor which are primarily used in connection with such system.(b) "Public water system" excludes a system serving only one single-family residence and a system with four or fewer connections all of which serve residences on the same farm.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department, in coordination with the department of enterprise services, shall identify one or more alternate locations suitable for the relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. The department shall first determine whether a property that the department currently owns or manages is suitable for relocation of the Bob Oke game farm.(2) In identifying alternate locations, the departments shall:(a) Conduct or obtain a hydrogeologic assessment of each candidate site to evaluate the potential for nutrient, manure, or other operational impacts to groundwater, surface water, and municipal or residential drinking water supplies;(b) Evaluate proximity to existing public water systems, wellhead protection areas, and critical aquifer recharge areas;(c) Consider access, infrastructure needs, land availability, zoning and land use compatibility, and the ability to maintain wildlife management and release functions;(d) Consult with affected local governments, water utilities, tribes, and conservation districts; and(e) Estimate the cost, timeline, and logistical requirements for relocation to each candidate site.(3) All expenses incurred for assessments, studies, evaluations, and analyses conducted under this section must be paid from existing appropriations and resources of the department and the department of enterprise services. Nothing in this section authorizes the departments to seek or expend new appropriations for the purpose of site assessment or evaluation.(4) By December 31, 2026, the department and the department of enterprise services shall submit a joint relocation report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must include:(a) A summary of sites evaluated and the criteria used;(b) Identification of a preferred alternate location;(c) A proposed acquisition or leasing strategy;(d) A schedule for transition of operations;(e) Estimated capital and operating costs; and(f) Any statutory or budgetary actions required to complete the relocation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall commence the relocation process by initiating procurement, site acquisition or leasing actions, and operational transition planning for the preferred alternate location identified in the report required under section 3 of this act.(2) The department shall complete the relocation of pheasant rearing and associated operations to the alternate location no later than 36 months after the effective date of this section, unless the legislature authorizes an extension by statute.(3) During the transition period, the department shall prioritize actions that immediately reduce nutrient and manure loading to the underlying aquifer, including further reductions in bird populations, expanded manure collection and off-site disposal, and increased groundwater monitoring.(4) The department may continue limited operations at the current site only to the extent necessary to maintain continuity of wildlife management and release programs until the alternate location becomes operational, and only if such operations comply with applicable water quality and pollution prevention requirements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department, in coordination with the department of ecology and the department of enterprise services, shall develop and implement a remediation plan for the Bob Oke game farm site.(2) The remediation plan must include:(a) Continued groundwater and soil monitoring;(b) Measures to prevent further nitrate or nutrient leaching to groundwater;(c) Evaluation of soil treatment, land cover, or other restoration techniques to reduce existing nutrient concentrations;(d) A schedule for decommissioning animal rearing infrastructure; and(e) Identification of potential future uses of the property that are compatible with protection of municipal and residential drinking water supplies.(3) A remediation status report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature every six months until the department of ecology determines that the site no longer poses a material risk to groundwater quality.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department of enterprise services may acquire, lease, or otherwise secure real property for the alternate location in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW.(2) The department may seek and accept federal, state, or local funds, grants, or cooperative agreements to support relocation and remediation activities.(3) The department and the department of enterprise services shall submit any requests for capital budget appropriations to implement this act to the governor, the senator and members of the house of representatives representing the legislative district in which the Bob Oke game farm is located, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate committees with jurisdiction over the capital budget for consideration during the 2027 legislative session.(4) The office of financial management shall assist the departments in identifying budgetary requirements for capital and operating expenditures necessary to implement this act.--- END ---